District of Columbia statutes.
5-705

Application of amendment to § 5-704.

The amendments made by Pub. L. 96-122, § 208(a)(2), to § 5-704 shall not apply with respect to deposits made, in whole or in part, prior to the end of such 90-day period.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 208(b)
1981 Ed., § 4-611.
1973 Ed., § 4-523.1.